Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2045
Shares without certificates.

(1) Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors of a corporation may authorize the issue of some or all of the shares of any or all of its classes or series without certificates. The authorization shall not affect shares already represented by certificates until they are surrendered to the corporation.

(2) Within a reasonable time after the issue or transfer of shares without certificates, the corporation shall send the shareholder a written statement of the information required on certificates by subsections (2) and (3) of section 21-2044 and, if applicable, section 21-2046.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 45.